Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1500.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 123.2. Cyber Charter School Funding and Policy Council.--(a) There is established a Cyber Charter School Funding and Policy Council.(b) The council shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Develop recommendations related to how cyber charter schools are funded, including process, amounts and restrictions.(2) Develop recommendations for policies impacting cyber charter schools, including:(i) Establishment.(ii) Application.(iii) Terms and form of written charters.(iv) Governance and management.(v) Assessment and evaluation.(vi) Enrollment and notification.(vii) Student attendance and wellness, including the delivery of services to a student with disabilities.(viii) Renewal, revocation or denial of a charter.(ix) Administering standardized testing.(x) Offices and facilities.(xi) Telework for employees.(xii) Public transparency.(xiii) Other policies related to cyber charter schools in this Commonwealth.(3) Recommend standards for truancy and attendance policies for cyber charter schools.(4) Hold public hearings and receive input from experts and interested parties.(5) No later than April 1, 2026, transmit the 20250HB1500PN1829 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recommendations to the Governor, the Secretary of Education and the General Assembly.(c) The goals of the council in developing its recommendations shall be:(1) Providing budget predictability for school districts, cyber charter schools and the Commonwealth.(2) Using a transparent, data-driven approach.(3) Improving collaboration between public schools.(4) Providing accountability for meeting measurable academic standards.(d) The council shall consist of the following members:(1) One (1) legislator from each of the four (4) legislative caucuses, to be appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, in consultation with the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the Senate and the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(2) The Secretary of Education or a designee.(3) The Deputy Secretary of Elementary and Secondary Education or a designee.(e) A majority vote of the members of the council shall be required for all actions taken by the council.(f) The council shall appoint a member to serve as chairperson.(g) The council shall hold meetings at the call of the chair. The council shall hold its first meeting within forty-five (45) days of the effective date of this section.(h) The members may not receive compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for all necessary travel and other reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the 20250HB1500PN1829 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 performance of their duties as members of the council.(i) The General Assembly shall provide administrative support, meeting space and any other assistance required by the council to carry out its duties under this section in cooperation with the department. The department shall provide the council with data, research and other information upon request by the council.(j) The cyber charter school funding and policy recommendations developed by the council shall not go into effect unless approved by an act of the General Assembly enacted after the effective date of this subsection.(k) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Council." The Cyber Charter School Funding and Policy Council established under this section."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth.Section 2. Section 134(b) of the act, added July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), is amended to read:Section 134. Advertising and Sponsorships.--* * *(b) [No later than August 1, 2025, each] As part of the annual financial reporting submitted under section 218, each public school entity shall report to the Department of Education the entity's total expenditures for paid media advertisements and sponsorships of public events [for the 2024-2025 school year]. The department shall compile the results of the reports and make the results available on the Department of Education's publicly accessible Internet website [by December 1, 2025].* * *20250HB1500PN1829 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. Section 1372(8) of the act is amended by adding a subclause to read:Section 1372. Exceptional Children; Education and Training.--* * *(8) Reporting of Expenditures Relating to Exceptional Students.* * *(vi) For purposes of reporting expenditures under this section and for calculating the costs for educating a special education student, costs shall be in accordance with Department of Education guidance and shall include the following:(A) Eligible instruction costs per special education student when specified in the student's individualized education plan shall include:(I) Prorated salary and benefits for a classroom special education teacher.(II) Prorated salary and benefits for a classroom aide, if the aide is assigned to a group of students.(III) Total cost of salary and benefits if a paraprofessional or one-on-one aide is assigned to the student.(B) Eligible related services costs per special education student when specified in the student's individualized education plan shall include:(I) Prorated transportation cost if the vehicle is transporting multiple students at one time.(II) Total transportation cost if the vehicle is transporting only the student receiving services.(III) Prorated cost of speech and language services if services are provided to a group of students.(IV) Total cost of speech and language services if services 20250HB1500PN1829 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 are provided to the student receiving services.(V) Total cost of individual services, including occupational therapy, physical therapy, vision services, hearing services, orientation and mobility and related services.(VI) Prorated cost of school nursing services if services are provided to a group of students.(VII) Total cost of a one-on-one nurse if the nurse is assigned to a student receiving services.(C) Eligible specialized equipment costs per special education student when specified in the student's individualized education plan shall include:(I) Total cost of braille materials for the student receiving services.(II) Total cost of assistive technology for the student receiving services.(III) Total cost of other equipment for the student receiving services.(D) Ineligible costs that may not be used in the calculation include:(I) Administrative costs.(II) Nonspecialized transportation costs.(III) General education costs, which are not applicable to special education services.Section 4. Section 1703-A of the act is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 1703-A. Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *20250HB1500PN1829 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Comprehensive support and improvement" shall mean a designation under 20 U.S.C. § 6311 (relating to State plans) for schools that face the most significant challenges related to academic achievement, student growth, graduation rate and other areas.* * *"Low-achieving school" shall mean a public school that ranked in the lowest fifteen per centum of the school's designation as an elementary school or a secondary school based on combined mathematics and reading scores from the annual assessment administered in the previous school year.* * *"Statewide cyber charter school tuition rate" shall mean the base amount as calculated under section 1725.1-A(e) and (f).Section 5. Section 1725.1-A(c) introductory paragraph of the act, added July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1725.1-A. Funding for Cyber Charter Schools.--* * *(c) Effective January 1, 2025, [and the entirety of each school year thereafter] through the 2024-2025 school year, for special education students, a cyber charter school shall receive for each student enrolled the lesser of:* * *(e) Notwithstanding section 1725-A(a)(2), for non-special education students for the 2025-2026 school year, the cyber charter school shall receive the Statewide cyber charter school tuition rate of eight thousand dollars ($8,000).(f) Notwithstanding section 1725-A(a)(2), for non-special education students beginning in the 2026-2027 school year and every school year thereafter, the cyber charter school shall 20250HB1500PN1829 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 receive the Statewide cyber charter school tuition rate under subsection (e) adjusted in accordance with the following:(1) The lesser of:(i) the average annual percentage change in real estate tax collection for all school districts for the most recent year as reported on the annual financial report submitted in accordance with section 218 and fixed as of the first day of June preceding the school year for which the calculation applies; or(ii) the average of the most recent percentage increase in the Statewide average weekly wage and the employment cost index as defined in s ection 30 2 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the "Taxpayer Relief Act."(2) If the average change under clause (1) is less than zero (0), there shall be no change in the Statewide cyber charter school tuition rate.(g) Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter , for special education students, a cyber charter school shall receive for each student with a current individualized education plan enrolled in the cyber charter school the same funding as each non-special education student as provided under subsections (e) and (f), plus an additional amount in accordance with the following : (1) For each special education student enrolled in the cyber charter school for which the annual expenditures for providing special education specific services and programs as reported by the cyber charter school under section 1372(8) fall within the amounts for Category 1, 2 or 3 as specified in section 1372(8), multiply the Statewide cyber charter school tuition rate AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (E) AND (F) by the corresponding multiplier specified in section 2509.5(bbb)(2) (i.1)(A), (B) or 20250HB1500PN1829 - 8 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) or the most recently enacted statute specifying the multiplier for Category 1, 2 or 3 students. For purposes of this clause, Category 1 shall include students in Categories 1A and 1B and Category 3 shall include students in Categories 3A and 3B under section 1372(8).(2) For each special education student enrolled in the cyber charter school, the cyber charter school shall, for purposes of calculating the charter school tuition rate under clause (1), use the multiplier corresponding with the section 1372(8) category under which the student was reported for the prior school year. For each newly identified special education student enrolled in the cyber charter school, the cyber charter school shall, for purposes of calculating the charter school tuition rate under clause (1), use the multiplier corresponding with Category 1.(3) At the end of each school year, a cyber charter school shall analyze the cyber charter school's actual expenditures for the provision of special education services and programs to each student in the prior school year. If the analysis shows that a student should have been placed in a different tuition rate category than was used to invoice the resident school district under clause (2), the cyber charter school shall place the student in the appropriate tuition rate category as part of the final documentation of payment to be made under section 1725-a(a)(5).(4) The department shall periodically review and monitor a cyber charter school's tuition rate category determinations to ensure compliance with this section and section 1372(8)(vi).(5) Failure to comply with this subsection shall be grounds for nonrenewal or revocation of a charter under section 1729-A.20250HB1500PN1829 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) If a cyber charter school incurs extraordinary expenses in providing a special education program or service to one or more students with disabilities, the cyber charter school may apply to the Secretary of Education for money in accordance with section 2509.8.Section 6. Section 1741-A(a)(1), (2) and (5) of the act are amended and the subsection is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 1741-A. Powers and duties of department.(a) Powers and duties.--The department shall:(1) Receive, review and act on applications for the creation of a cyber charter school and have the power to request further information from applicants, obtain input from interested persons or entities and hold hearings regarding applications. The department shall create and post on its publicly accessible Internet website a standard application form for the creation of a new cyber charter school.(2) Renew the charter of cyber charter school and renew the charter of a charter school approved under section 1717-A or 1718-A which provides instruction through the Internet or other electronic means. Upon renewal of a charter of a charter school approved under section 1717-A or 1718-A, the charter school shall qualify as a cyber charter school under this subdivision and shall be subject to the provisions of this subdivision. The department shall create and post on its publicly accessible Internet website a standard application form for existing cyber charter schools seeking renewal of the cyber charter school's charter.* * *20250HB1500PN1829 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Develop forms, including the standard application forms under paragraphs (1) and (2) and notification form under paragraph (6)(ii) and section 1748-A(b), necessary to carry out the provisions of this subdivision.(6) (i) By February 1 of each year, notify each cyber charter school identified as a low-achieving school of the following duties:(A) Within 15 days of receipt of a notification under this subparagraph, a cyber charter school shall notify the parents of each enrolled student of the cyber charter school's designation.(B) Upon registration of a kindergarten student and enrollment of a new student in any grade, a cyber charter school shall notify the parents or guardians of the student that the student will be assigned to a low-achieving school during the school year of the cyber charter school's designation.(ii) Failure to provide the notice required under subparagraph (i)(A) or (B) shall be grounds for nonrenewal or revocation of a charter under section 1729-A.(iii) The notice under subparagraph (i) shall be in a form provided by the department.(7) Annually post the annual budget of the cyber charter school provided under section 1716-A(i).* * *Section 7. Section 1742-A of the act is amended to read:Section 1742-A. Assessment and evaluation.(a) Duties of department.--The department shall:(1) Annually assess whether each cyber charter school is 20250HB1500PN1829 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 meeting the goals of its charter and is in compliance with the provisions of the charter and conduct a comprehensive review prior to granting a [five-year] renewal of the charter.(2) Annually review each cyber charter school's performance on the Pennsylvania System of School Assessment test, standardized tests and other performance indicators to ensure compliance with 22 Pa. Code Ch. 4 (relating to academic standards and assessment) or subsequent regulations promulgated to replace 22 Pa. Code Ch. 4.(3) Have ongoing access to all records, instructional materials and student and staff records of each cyber charter school and to every cyber charter school facility to ensure the cyber charter school is in compliance with its charter and this subdivision.(4) Annually publish the results of the assessment under paragraph (1) and the evaluation performance standards under paragraph (2) for each cyber charter school on the department's publicly available Internet website.(5) Upon completion for each cyber charter school, publish the comprehensive review under paragraph (1).(b) Penalty.--Failure to provide information requested by the department under this section shall be grounds for nonrenewal or revocation of a charter under section 1729-A.Section 8. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1742.1-A. Fund balance limits.(a) Limitation.--For the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter, a cyber charter school may not accumulate an unassigned fund balance that exceeds 12% of the cyber charter school's total expenditures.20250HB1500PN1829 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Refund.--Any unassigned fund balance in place on June 30, 2026, and on June 30 of each year thereafter, in excess of the fund balance limit under subsection (a) shall be refunded on a pro rata basis within 90 days to all school districts that paid tuition to the cyber charter school in the prior school year, based upon the cyber charter school's average daily membership for each school district that paid tuition to the cyber charter school. Failure to comply with this subsection shall be grounds for nonrenewal or revocation of a charter under section 1729-A.(c) Information.--By October 31, 2026, and by October 31 of each year thereafter, each cyber charter school shall provide the department and all school districts that paid tuition to the cyber charter school in the prior school year with information certifying compliance with this section. The information shall be provided in a form and manner prescribed by the department and shall include information on the cyber charter school's ending unassigned fund balance expressed as a dollar amount and as a percentage of the cyber charter school's total budgeted expenditures for that school year.(d) Prohibition.--Unassigned money of the cyber charter school in excess of the unassigned fund balance limit may not be used to pay bonuses or provide employment incentives to an administrator, board of trustees member, employee, staff member or contractor and may not be transferred to a charter school foundation. If a cyber charter school uses money in excess of the unassigned fund balance limit to pay bonuses or provide employment incentives to an administrator, board of trustees member, employee, staff member or contractor or transfers the money to a charter school foundation, the value of the bonus 20250HB1500PN1829 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 payment, employment incentive or money transfer shall be refunded on a pro rata basis to all school districts that paid tuition to the cyber charter school in the prior school year, based upon the number of students for whom each school district paid tuition to the cyber charter school multiplied by the Statewide cyber charter school tuition rate under section 1725.1-A.(e) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "unassigned fund balance" shall mean the portion of the fund balance of a cyber charter school that is appropriable for expenditure or not legally or otherwise obligated for a specific or tentative future use as reported on the annual financial report at the end of the school year.Section 9. Section 1743-A(a)(2) and (3), (e)(1), (f) and (h) of the act are amended, subsections (a), (c) and (d) are amended by adding paragraphs and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1743-A. Cyber charter school requirements and prohibitions.(a) Special financial requirements prohibited.--A cyber charter school shall not:* * *(2) except as provided for in subsection (e), provide payments to parents or guardians for the purchase of instructional materials; [or](3) except as compensation for the provision of specific services, enter into agreements to provide funds to a school entity[.]; or(4) provide payments, gifts, reimbursement or other incentives to a parent or guardian of any student or 20250HB1500PN1829 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prospective student for enrolling, considering enrolling or providing information to any parent or guardian enrolling or considering enrolling a student in the charter school.* * *(b.1) Enrollment parameters.--If a cyber charter school is designated for comprehensive support and improvement, the cyber charter school shall be subject to an enrollment parameter and may not expand its enrollment beyond a 5% increase of its highest reported enrollment of the previous three years from the date of identification. Upon designation, the department shall calculate the cyber charter school's enrollment parameter and shall communicate the enrollment parameter to the cyber charter school. The enrollment parameter may not be surpassed during any period the cyber charter school retains the designation of comprehensive support and improvement. Failure to comply with this subsection shall be grounds for nonrenewal or revocation of a charter under section 1729-A.(c) School district.--A cyber charter school shall make available upon request, either in writing or electronically, to each student's school district of residence the following:* * *(5) Proof of residency for each student that the school district is required to make payments for under sections 1725-A and 1725.1-A. The following shall apply:(i) Proof of residency shall be a document with the parent or guardian's name and address on it, including an active residential lease agreement, a mortgage statement no more than three months old, a bank statement no more than three months old, a utility or Internet bill no more than three months old, a tax bill no more than three 20250HB1500PN1829 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 months old or an insurance document no more than three months old.(ii) A school district shall not request proof of residency from a cyber charter school for a student enrolled at a cyber charter school more than once per month.(d) Parent or guardian.--Upon request and prior to the student's first day in a cyber charter school, the cyber charter school shall, either in writing or electronically, provide to the parent or guardian of a student the following:* * *(14) A notice of the requirement under subsection (c)(5) to provide proof of residency upon request, not to exceed monthly.(d.1) Statements required.--Prior to the student's first day at a cyber charter school, the cyber charter school shall obtain a written statement from the child's parent or guardian acknowledging receipt and acceptance of the cyber charter school's information and policies under subsection (d).(e) Students.--For each student enrolled, a cyber charter school shall:(1) provide all instructional materials, which may include electronic or digital books in place of textbooks;* * *(f) Annual report.--A cyber charter school shall submit an annual report no later than August 1 of each year to the department in the form prescribed by the department[.] to be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. Beginning with the annual report for the 2025-2026 school year, the department shall require the written report to include:20250HB1500PN1829 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A list of all entities providing financing for capital projects of the cyber charter school.(2) All expenditures to an educational management service provider.(3) The annual budget of the cyber charter school under section 1716-A(i).(4) Data in a form prescribed by the department to validate student wellness checks required under section 1748.1-A.* * *(h) Offices and facilities.--(1) A cyber charter school shall [maintain]:(i) Maintain an administrative office within this Commonwealth where all student records shall be maintained at all times and which shall [provide] be considered as the principal place of business for service of process for any action brought against the cyber charter school or cyber charter school staff members.(ii) Provide the department with the addresses of all offices and facilities of the cyber charter school, the ownership thereof and copies of any lease arrangements[. The administrative office of the cyber charter school shall be considered as the principal place of business for service of process for any action brought against the cyber charter school or cyber charter school staff members.] entered by or on behalf of the cyber charter school and a description of the purpose and use of each facility. The cyber charter school shall notify the department of any changes in this information within ten days of the change. The department shall post the 20250HB1500PN1829 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information required under this paragraph on its publicly accessible Internet website.(iii) Provide the department with a list of all entities providing financing for capital projects of the cyber charter school.(2) A cyber charter school shall be prohibited from owning or having any financial interest in additional offices and facilities beyond the administrative office under paragraph (1) without seeking an amendment to its charter under section 1747-A and receiving the approval from the department.(3) Revenue generated from the rent, lease or sale of charter-owned property shall be paid annually by June 30 of the next school year to resident school districts by prorating the revenue based on each resident school district's average daily membership in the cyber charter school as reported to the department.(4) A cyber charter school shall report payments made under paragraph (3) on the cyber charter school's annual financial report in a format determined by the department.(5) Failure to comply with this subsection shall be grounds for nonrenewal or revocation of a charter under section 1729-A.* * *(j) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Gift." Anything that is received without consideration of equal or greater value, provided that the value of the gift is greater than $10.20250HB1500PN1829 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 10. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1743.1-A. Cyber charter school fund balance accountability.(a) Information required.--No later than October 31, 2025, each cyber charter school shall submit to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, a statement of revenues, expenditures and changes in fund balances for governmental funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, including a narrative and documentation explaining the specific purpose and related amounts for which any governmental fund balance is designated as nonspendable, restricted, committed or assigned as classified in the annual financial reports submitted in accordance with section 218.(b) Payment.--No later than December 31, 2025, based on the information reported under subsection (a), each cyber charter school shall pay to the Commonwealth an amount equal to the sum of the amounts as follows:(1) The unassigned fund balance payment calculated as follows:(i) Multiply the total expenditures of the cyber charter school by 0.5.(ii) Subtract the product calculated under subparagraph (i) from the end-of-year unassigned fund balance.(iii) Determine the greater of $0 or the difference in subparagraph (ii).(2) Capital project fund payment calculated as follows:(i) Multiply the total expenditures of the cyber charter school by 0.2.(ii) Subtract the product calculated in subparagraph 20250HB1500PN1829 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) from the end-of-year fund balance for the capital projects fund.(iii) Determine the greater of $0 or the difference in subparagraph (ii).(c) Use.--The money received under this section shall be transferred to the Commonwealth Financing Authority for the program established under section 1753.2-E of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L. 343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code. The following shall apply:(1) No less than 25% of the money available under this section shall be used to fund projects recommended by the Department of Community and Economic Development under section 1753.2-E(b.1). The Department of Community and Economic Development may, in its discretion, recommend projects from applications received in a previous application round.(2) Notwithstanding section 1753.2-E(a) and (n) of The Fiscal Code, a charter school and a regional charter school shall be eligible to apply for and receive money available under this section provided that if the charter school or regional charter school facility where the awarded project is located is sold, transferred or conveyed within five years from the date of the award of the grant, the charter school or regional charter school shall notify the Commonwealth Financing Authority and the new owner of record shall reimburse the Commonwealth Financing Authority in an amount equal to 80% of the amount of the grant.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20250HB1500PN1829 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Capital project fund." The money accounting for financial resources that are restricted, committed or assigned to be obligated or expended for capital outlays by a cyber charter school."Unassigned fund balance." That portion of the fund balance of a cyber charter school that is appropriable for expenditures or not legally or otherwise obligated for a specific or tentative future use as reported on the annual financial report at the end of the school year.Section 11. Section 1745-A(f)(3) of the act is amended to read:Section 1745-A. Establishment of cyber charter school.* * *(f) Evaluation criteria.--* * *(3) Upon approval of a cyber charter school application, a written charter shall be developed which shall contain the provisions of the charter application and be signed by the secretary and each member of the board of trustees of the cyber charter school. The charter, when duly signed, shall act as legal authorization of the establishment of a cyber charter school. The charter shall be legally binding on the department, the cyber charter school and its board of trustees. The charter shall be for a period of no less than three years nor more than five years [and may be renewed for a period of five years by the department].* * *Section 12. Section 1747-A heading and introductory paragraph of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:20250HB1500PN1829 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1747-A. Cyber charter school application, renewal and amendment.(a) Application.--In addition to the provisions of section 1719-A, an application to establish a cyber charter school shall also include the following:* * *(b) Form.--The application to establish a cyber charter school shall be made upon the standard application form in paper and electronic formats as determined by the department.(c) Renewal.--(1) A cyber charter school shall submit a renewal application as provided under section 1719-A with the department by October 1 of the final year of the charter.(2) A cyber charter school's charter may be renewed for a period of no less than three years and no more than five years by the department or appeal board.(d) Charter amendments.--Amendments to charters shall be in accordance with the following:(1) A cyber charter school may request amendments to its approved written charter by filing a written document describing the requested amendment with the department. (2) Within 60 days of the department's receipt of the request for an amendment, the department shall provide for public comment on the requested amendment under 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings). (3) An applicant for an amendment shall have the right to appeal the denial of a requested amendment to the appeal board provided for under section 1721-A. Section 13. Sections 1748-A and 1748.1-A of the act, amended or added July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), are amended to read:20250HB1500PN1829 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1748-A. Enrollment and notification.(a) Notice to school district.--(1) Within 10 days of the enrollment of a student to a cyber charter school, the parent or guardian and the cyber charter school shall notify the student's school district of residence of the enrollment through the use of the notification form under subsection (b).(2) If a school district [which has received notice under paragraph (1)] determines that a student is not a resident of the school district, the following apply:(i) [Within seven days of receipt of the notice under paragraph (1), the] The school district shall notify the cyber charter school and the department that the student is not a resident of the school district. Notification of nonresidence shall include the basis for the determination.(ii) [Within seven days of] Following the notification under subparagraph (i), the [cyber charter school] department shall review the notification of nonresidence[, respond to the school district and provide a copy of the response to the department]. If the [cyber charter school] department agrees that a student is not a resident of the school district, it shall determine and notify the cyber charter school of the proper district of residence of the student. [before requesting funds from another school district.(iii) Within seven days of receipt of the response under subparagraph (ii), the school district shall notify the cyber charter school that it agrees with the cyber charter school's determination or does not agree with the 20250HB1500PN1829 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cyber charter school's determination.(iv) A school district that has notified the cyber charter school that it does not agree with the cyber charter school's determination under subparagraph (iii) shall appeal to the department for a final determination.](v) All decisions of the department regarding the school district of residence of a student shall be subject to review by the Commonwealth Court.(vi) A school district shall continue to make payments to a cyber charter school under section 1725-A during the time in which the school district of residence of a student is in dispute.(vii) If a final determination is made that a student is not a resident of an appealing school district, the cyber charter school shall return all funds provided on behalf of that student during the period for which the student was not a resident of the school district to the school district within 30 days.(viii) If a final determination is made by the department or Commonwealth Court that a student is not a resident of an appealing school district, the secretary shall assess an administrative fine equal to the Statewide cyber charter school tuition rate under section 1725.1-A on the cyber charter school. Any sum collected as a penalty under this subparagraph may be used by the department for the payment of costs of administration of this article.(ix) The department shall revoke or deny renewal of a cyber charter school's charter if, in any school year 20250HB1500PN1829 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other than a cyber charter school's first year of operation, the number of administrative fines assessed on the cyber charter school exceeds 1% of the cyber charter school's average daily membership in the previous school year.(b) Notification form.--The department shall develop a notification form for use under subsection (a). The notification shall include:(1) The name, home address and mailing address of the student.(2) The grade in which the student is being enrolled.(3) The date the student will be enrolled.(4) The name and address of the cyber charter school and the name and telephone number of a contact person able to provide information regarding the cyber charter school.(5) The signature of the parent or guardian and an authorized representative of the cyber charter school.(6) Proof of residency, which shall be a document with the parent or guardian's name and address on it, including an active residential lease agreement, a mortgage statement no more than three months old, a bank statement no more than three months old, a utility or Internet bill no more than three months old, a tax bill no more than three months old or an insurance document no more than three months old.(c) Withdrawal.--(1) The cyber charter school and the parent or guardian of a student enrolled in a cyber charter school shall provide written notification to the student's school district of residence within 10 days following the withdrawal of a student from the cyber charter school.20250HB1500PN1829 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) If the written notification required under paragraph (1) is dated after a notification by the school district under subsection (a)(2)(i), the administrative fine provided under subsection (a)(2)(viii) applies.Section 1748.1-A. Enrollee wellness checks.(a) Requirements.--A cyber charter school shall, at least once during any week consisting of at least three full or partial days of academic instruction, ensure that each enrolled student is [able to be] visibly seen and communicated with in real time by a teacher, administrator or other representative of the cyber charter school, either in person or via electronic means, in order to ensure the well-being of the student and verify participation in the educational program. The requirement under this subsection may be satisfied by students turning on a webcam during synchronous online instruction.(a.1) Failure to comply.--Failure to comply with subsection (a) shall be grounds for nonrenewal or revocation of a charter under section 1729-A.(b) Report.--If any indication of abuse, neglect or harm to a child is observed, the cyber charter school administrator, employee or representative shall report the concerns in accordance with 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to child protective services).(c) Well-being.--The department may require proof of compliance with this section by a cyber charter school to ensure the well-being of the enrolled student in a cyber charter school and verify participation in the educational program.Section 14. Section 1749-A(a)(1) of the act is amended by adding subparagraphs and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:20250HB1500PN1829 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1749-A. Applicability of other provisions of this act and of other acts and regulations.(a) General requirements.--Cyber charter schools shall be subject to the following:(1) The following:* * *(xiv.1) Section 751.* * *(xx.1) Section 807.1* * *(d) Penalty.--Failure to comply with this section shall be grounds for nonrenewal or revocation of a charter under section 1729-A.Section 15. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1752-A. Cyber charter school moratorium.Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year through the 2029-2030 school year, the department may not review or act on any application for the establishment of a new cyber charter school regardless of the date on which the application was or is received by the department.Section 16. Section 2509.8(f)(i) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 2509.8. Extraordinary Special Education Program Expenses.--* * *(f) (i) For the 2016-2017 school year [and each school year thereafter] through the 2024-2025 school year, an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the special education appropriation shall be distributed to school districts and charter schools for extraordinary expenses incurred in providing a special education program or service to one or more students with disabilities as 20250HB1500PN1829 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approved by the Secretary of Education. Such special education program or service shall include, but not be limited to, the transportation of students with disabilities; services related to occupational therapy, physical therapy, speech and language, hearing impairments or visual impairments; or training in orientation and mobility for children who are visually impaired or blind.* * *(g) For the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter, an amount equal to two percent (2%) of the special education appropriation shall be distributed to school districts and charter schools for extraordinary expenses incurred in providing a special education program or service to one or more students with disabilities as approved by the Secretary of Education. The special education program or service shall include, but not be limited to, the transportation of students with disabilities, services related to occupational therapy, physical therapy, speech and language, hearing impairments or visual impairments or training in orientation and mobility for children who are visually impaired or blind. The following shall apply:(i) No less than one percent (1%) of the special education appropriation may be distributed to school districts and charter schools as follows:(A) Funds distributed under this subparagraph shall be allocated for students for which all the following criteria are met:(I) Expenses are incurred on an annual basis that are equal to or greater than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).(II) The expenses associated with the application represent 20250HB1500PN1829 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 at least one percent (1%) of the school district's or charter school's total special education expenditures as reported in the most recent annual financial reports submitted in accordance with section 218.(III) The student must not have been enrolled in the school district or charter school for more than two (2) consecutive school years.(B) The department shall prioritize applications with the highest rates in clause (A)(II).(ii) No less than one percent (1%) of the special education appropriation may be distributed to school districts and charter schools as follows:(A) Money distributed under this subparagraph shall be allocated for students for which all the following criteria are met:(I) Expenses are incurred on an annual basis that are equal to or greater than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).(II) The student must not have been enrolled in the school district or charter school for more than two (2) consecutive school years.(B) The department shall prioritize applications with the highest expenses in clause (A)(I).(iii) The following shall apply to money distributed to a school district or a charter school under this subsection:(A) Subtract the State subsidies paid on behalf of the student to the school district or, for a student enrolled in a charter school, the charter school payment received by the charter school where the child is enrolled from the expense incurred for the student.(B) No school district or charter school shall in any school 20250HB1500PN1829 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 year receive an aggregate amount under this subsection which exceeds the total amount of funding available multiplied by the percentage equal to the greatest percentage of the State's special education students enrolled in a school district or charter school.(h) (1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a school district or charter school may not in any school year receive more than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).(2) A school district of the first class may not in any school year receive more than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000).Section 17. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1500PN1829 - 30 - 123456789101112